Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Acquisition of Vacant Properties

13-21-201. Findings, purpose and policy.

It is hereby found that:

There exist in many municipalities and counties blighted and deteriorated properties in neighborhoods which cause the deterioration of those and contiguous neighborhoods and constitute a serious and growing menace which is injurious to the public health, safety, morals and general welfare of the residents of Tennessee, and are beyond remedy and control solely by regulatory process in the exercise of the police power;

The existence of blighted and deteriorated properties, both residential and commercial, within neighborhoods, and the growth and spread of blight and deterioration or the threatened deterioration of other neighborhoods and properties:

Contribute substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, and to losses by fire and accident;

Necessitate expensive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds for the preservation of the public health and safety, for crime prevention, correction, prosecution, and punishment, for the treatment of juvenile delinquency, for the maintenance of adequate police, fire and accident protection, and for other public services and facilities;

Constitute an economic and social liability;

Substantially impair or arrest the sound growth of the community;

Retard the provision of decent, safe and sanitary housing and public accommodations;

Depreciate assessable values;

Cause an abnormal exodus of families and businesses from these neighborhoods; and

Are detrimental to the health, the well-being and the dignity of many residents of these neighborhoods;

This menace cannot be effectively dealt with by private enterprise without the aids provided herein; and

The benefits which would result from eliminating the blighted properties that cause the blight and deterioration of neighborhoods will accrue to the inhabitants of the neighborhoods in which these conditions exist and to the inhabitants of this state generally.

It is hereby declared that:

It is the policy of this state to protect and promote the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state by eliminating the blight and deterioration of neighborhoods through the elimination of blighted and deteriorated properties within these neighborhoods;

The elimination of such blight and deterioration and the preparation of the properties for sale or lease, for development or redevelopment, constitute a public use and purpose for which public money may be expended and private property acquired, and are governmental functions in the interest of the health, safety, and welfare of the people of Tennessee; and

The necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted herein is hereby declared to be a legislative determination.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 1; 1995, ch. 391, § 2.

13-21-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Blighted” or “deteriorated” property means any vacant structure or vacant or unimproved lot or parcel, whether residential, commercial or industrial, in a predominantly built-up neighborhood:

Which because of physical condition or use is regarded as a public nuisance at common law or has been declared a public nuisance in accordance with local housing, building, plumbing, fire or related codes;

Which because of physical condition, use or occupancy is considered an attractive nuisance to children, including, but not limited to, abandoned wells, shafts, basements, excavations, and unsafe fences or structures;

Which, because it is dilapidated, unsanitary, unsafe, vermin-infested or lacking in the facilities and equipment required by the housing code of the municipality, has been designated by the appropriate agency or department responsible for enforcement of the code as unfit for human habitation;

Which is a fire hazard, or is otherwise dangerous to the safety of persons or property;

From which the utilities, plumbing, heating, sewerage or other facilities have been disconnected, destroyed, removed, or rendered ineffective so that the property is unfit for its intended use;

Which by reason of neglect or lack of maintenance has become a place for accumulation of trash and debris, or a haven for rodents or other vermin;

Which has been tax delinquent for a period of at least three (3) years; or

Which has not been rehabilitated within the time constraints placed upon the owner by the appropriate code enforcement agency;

“Blighted” or “deteriorated” does not apply to any property used for agricultural purposes;

“Municipality” means any county, including any county having a metropolitan form of government, or incorporated city or town in this state;

“Redevelopment” means the planning or replanning, design or redesign, acquisition, clearance, development and disposal, or any combination of these, of a property in the preparation of such property for residential, commercial, industrial, and related uses, as may be appropriate or necessary;

“Residential, commercial, industrial, and related use” means residential or commercial or industrial property for sale, lease or rental and related uses; such related uses include, but are not limited to, park and recreation areas, neighborhood community service, parking lots or structures, and any use which is consistent with and/or complementary to the existing properties in the area; and

“Vacant property review commission” means a commission established by ordinance to review vacant properties to make a written determination of blight and deterioration.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 2; 1995, ch. 391, § 3; 1998, ch. 948, §§ 1-3.

13-21-203. Adoption of provisions by ordinance — Vacant property review commission.

If the legislative body of a municipality finds and declares that there exists in the municipality blighted or deteriorated properties and that there is need in the municipality for the exercise of powers, functions and duties conferred by this part, the legislative body may adopt this part by ordinance.

The ordinance adopting this part shall also establish a vacant property review commission which shall certify properties as blighted or deteriorated to the legislative body.

The ordinance shall specify the duties of, the number of members that will serve on, the requirements of membership, and the makeup of, the commission.

Members shall be appointed by the chief executive officer and approved by the legislative body.

No officer or employee of the municipality whose duties include enforcement of local housing, building, plumbing, fire or related codes shall be appointed to the commission.

One (1) or more municipalities may act jointly in establishing a vacant property review commission and in such case, members of such commission shall be appointed jointly by the municipalities or in part by one (1) municipality and in part by the other. The ordinances creating such joint vacant property review commission may provide that the power of eminent domain may be exercised upon certification by the commission to one (1) or more of such municipalities acting singularly or jointly.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 3; 1995, ch. 391, § 4.

13-21-204. Acquisition by eminent domain authorized — Litter removal.

For purposes of this section:

“Community organization” means a community-oriented organization or group including, but not limited to, a school group, church youth group, neighborhood preservation nonprofit corporation, or community support group;

“Litter” means overgrown plant life including, but not limited to, trees, vines, grasses, and underbrush or the accumulation of debris, trash, garbage, or any combination of the preceding elements; and

“Vacant property” means property on which no building exists or on which a building exists but any such building is no longer utilized for any business, commercial or residential purposes.

A municipality may acquire by eminent domain pursuant to title 29, chapters 16 and 17, any property determined to be blighted or deteriorated pursuant to this part, and shall have the power to hold, clear, manage or dispose of property so acquired for residential, commercial, industrial and related use, pursuant to this part.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality located in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, to implement this subsection (c), within any such municipality, a community organization shall be entitled to petition a municipality acquiring vacant property pursuant to subsection (b) in order to enter upon such vacant property to remove litter from such property.

Upon the filing of such a petition, the municipality is authorized to contract with such community organization for such purposes. The contract shall provide for the manner in which the community organization shall be compensated for remedying the conditions pursuant to such contract.

Any municipality that contracts with a community organization for such purposes shall be absolutely immune from any liability to any and all persons and for damage to the vacant property for conditions remedied by the community organization. No monetary liability and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against the municipality for acts of omission or commission of such community organization for conditions remedied pursuant to such contract.

The community organization may coordinate with the department of correction to utilize inmates for removing litter from vacant property as part of a volunteer inmate work program as described in § 4-6-201 or a similar department of correction program. If the community organization utilizes inmates pursuant to this subdivision (c)(2)(C), then the community organization shall not be held liable for any damage to the vacant property or for any injury incurred by inmates arising from the removal of litter.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 4; 1995, ch. 391, § 5; 1998, ch. 948, § 4; 2010, ch. 923, § 4; 2014, ch. 963, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2014, ch. 963, § 5 provided that the secretary of state is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

13-21-205. Certification of property as blighted or deteriorated — Notification of owner.

The legislative body shall not institute eminent domain proceedings pursuant to this part unless the commission has certified that the property is blighted or deteriorated. A property which has been referred to the commission by an agency of the municipality as blighted or deteriorated may only be certified to the legislative body as blighted or deteriorated after the commission has determined that:

The owner of the property or designated agent has been sent an order by the appropriate agency of the municipality to eliminate the conditions which are in violation of local codes or law;

The property is vacant;

The property is blighted and deteriorated;

The commission has notified the property owner or designated agent that the property has been determined to be blighted or deteriorated and the time period for correction of such condition has expired and the property owner or agent has failed to comply with the notice; and

The planning commission of the municipality has determined that the reuse of the property for residential, commercial, industrial and related use is in keeping with the comprehensive plan.

The findings required by subsection (a) shall be in writing and included in the report to the legislative body.

The commission shall notify the owner of the property or a designated agent that a determination of blight or deterioration has been made and that failure to eliminate the conditions causing the blight shall render the property subject to condemnation by the municipality under this part. Notice shall be mailed to the owner or designated agent by certified mail, return receipt requested. However, if the address of the owner or designated agent is unknown and cannot be ascertained by the commission in the exercise of reasonable diligence, copies of the notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the property affected. The written notice sent to the owner or the owner's agent shall describe the conditions that render the property blighted and deteriorated, and shall demand abatement of the conditions within ninety (90) days of the receipt of such notice.

An extension of the ninety-day time period may be granted by the commission if the owner or designated agent demonstrates that such period is insufficient to correct the conditions cited in the notice.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 5; 1995, ch. 391, § 6; 1998, ch. 948, § 5.

13-21-206. Eminent domain proceedings — Findings required.

The legislative body of the municipality may institute eminent domain proceedings pursuant to title 29, chapters 16 and 17, against any property which has been certified as blighted or deteriorated by the commission if it finds that:

Such property has deteriorated to such an extent as to constitute a serious and growing menace to the public health, safety and welfare;

Such property is likely to continue to deteriorate unless corrected;

The continued deterioration of such property may contribute to the blighting or deterioration of the area immediately surrounding the property; and

The owner of such property has failed to correct the deterioration of the property.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 6.

13-21-207. Conflicts of interest.

No officer or employee of the municipality, or of the vacant property review commission, who in the course of such officer's or employee's duties is required to participate in the determination of property blight or deterioration or the issuance of notices on code violations which may lead to a determination of blight or deterioration, shall acquire any interest in any property declared to be blighted or deteriorated.

If any such officer or employee owns or has a financial interest, direct or indirect, in any property certified to be blighted or deteriorated, the officer or employee shall immediately disclose, in writing, such interest to the commission and to the legislative body, and such disclosure shall be entered in the minutes of the commission and of the legislative body.

Failure to so disclose such interest shall constitute misconduct in office.

No payment shall be made to any officer or employee for any property or interest therein acquired by the municipality from such officer or employee unless the amount of such payment is fixed by court order in eminent domain proceedings, or unless payment is unanimously approved by the legislative body.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 7.

13-21-208. Applicability.

This part shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

28,500 28,560

28,600 28,660

48,400 48,500

58,075 58,125

67,500 67,600

74,500 74,600

287,700 287,800

319,625 319,725

777,113 777,500

This part shall also apply in any county having a metropolitan government having a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1990, ch. 1034, § 10; 1992, ch. 709, § 1; 1993, ch. 48, § 1; 1995, ch. 391, §§ 7, 8; 1997, ch. 247, § 1; 2004, ch. 820, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.